Georgia, session 2025_26, HB878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Pediatric acute-onset neuropsychiatric syndrome (PANS) and pediatric autoimmune
neuropsychiatric disorder associated with streptococcal infection (PANDAS) create the
sudden onset of obsessive-compulsive disorder in children, causing previously healthy and
emotionally well-adjusted children to experience severe anxiety and emotional
disturbances;
(2) Children with PANS and PANDAS experience a range of symptoms, including tics or
other abnormal movements, severe separation anxiety, generalized anxiety, irritability,
aggression, personality changes, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, marked
H. B. 878
- 1 -

LC 59 0169
deterioration in learning and school performance, and developmental regression, including
regression in handwriting;
(3) Children with PANS and PANDAS may experience a moderate to dramatic
improvement with antibiotics, intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG) treatment, or
plasmapheresis;
(4) Researchers at leading academic institutions are engaged in extensive research on the
disease mechanism of and effective treatments for these disorders;
(5) Children's Healthcare of Atlanta (CHOA) is developing a pilot clinic to treat children
with PANS and PANDAS;
(6) The 2019 PANS Study Committee Report of the House of Representatives identified
specific policy goals for Georgia regarding insurance coverage for diagnosis and treatment;
pediatric provider training in medical, educational, and behavioral health settings; and
increased public health surveillance of these disorders;
(7) The deep medical and bioscience resources in Georgia make our state well situated to
meaningfully contribute to best medical practices, research, and medical technology to
advance the early diagnosis and treatment of children with PANS and PANDAS;
(8) Expert providers in the PANS consortium estimate that one in 200 children have PANS
or PANDAS, meaning these diseases affect roughly 15,000 children in Georgia;
(9) Many general pediatricians, nurse practitioners, and pediatric subspecialists are not
familiar with the most current diagnostic criteria and treatment guidelines for these
disorders;
(10) In addition to lack of access to treating providers, many insurers do not cover
treatment for PANS and PANDAS, which can cost tens of thousands of dollars, placing the
treatment out of reach for most families;
(11) The Southeastern PANS/PANDAS Association (SEPPA) is a Georgia based,
nonprofit organization dedicated to expanding access to expert, insurance based care for
children and families suffering from PANS and PANDAS in this region; and
H. B. 878
- 2 -

LC 59 0169
(12) It is imperative that there be greater public awareness of this serious health issue
among parents, policymakers, and medical providers in Georgia.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
October 9 of each year is designated as 'PANDAS Day' in Georgia."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 878
- 3 -